Illinois, session 104th, HB1021.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Park District Code is amended by adding 5Section 8-60 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 1205/8-60 new)7    Sec. 8-60. Rescue trapping. Notwithstanding any other 8provision of law, a park district police officer, code 9enforcement officer, or any official or employee of a park 10district with the authority to issue citations may not ticket 11an individual or group or arrest an individual for setting 12live traps to capture animals with the intention of rescuing 13those animals. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.